Utah statutes.
53-3-227.   Driving a motor vehicle prohibited while driving privilege denied, suspended, disqualified, or revoked -- Penalties.

(1)  A person whose driving privilege has been denied, suspended, disqualified, or revoked under this chapter or under the laws of the state in which the person's driving privilege was granted and who drives any motor vehicle upon the highways of this state while that driving privilege is denied, suspended, disqualified, or revoked shall be punished as provided in this section.

(2)  A person convicted of a violation of Subsection (1), other than a violation specified in Subsection (3), is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.

(3) (a)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person's conviction under Subsection (1) is based on the person driving a motor vehicle while the person's driving privilege is suspended, disqualified, or revoked for:

(i)  a refusal to submit to a chemical test under Section 41-6a-520;

(ii)  a violation of Section 41-6a-502;

(iii)  a violation of a local ordinance that complies with the requirements of Section 41-6a-510;

(iv)  a violation of Section 41-6a-517;

(v)  a violation of Section 76-5-207;

(vi)  a criminal action that the person plead guilty to as a result of a plea bargain after having been originally charged with violating one or more of the sections or ordinances under this Subsection (3);

(vii)  a revocation or suspension which has been extended under Subsection 53-3-220(2); 

(viii)  where disqualification is the result of driving a commercial motor vehicle while the person's CDL is disqualified, suspended, canceled, or revoked under Subsection 53-3-414(1); or

(ix)  a violation of Section 41-6a-530.

(b)  A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person's conviction under Subsection (1) is based on the person driving a motor vehicle while the person's driving privilege is suspended, disqualified, or revoked by any state, the United States, or any district, possession, or territory of the United States for violations corresponding to the violations listed in Subsection (3)(a).

(c)  A fine imposed under this Subsection (3) shall be at least the maximum fine for a class C misdemeanor under Section 76-3-301.

